Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.070

Examination—Contents—Tests.

The hearing aid specialist written or practical examination, or both, provided in RCW 18.35.050 shall consist of:

(1) Tests of knowledge in the following areas as they pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:

(a) Basic physics of sound;

(b) The human hearing mechanism, including the science of hearing and the causes and rehabilitation of abnormal hearing and hearing disorders; and

(c) Structure and function of hearing instruments.

(2) Tests of proficiency in the following areas as they pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:

(a) Pure tone audiometry, including air conduction testing and bone conduction testing;

(b) Live voice or recorded voice speech audiometry, including speech reception threshold testing and speech discrimination testing;

(c) Effective masking;

(d) Recording and evaluation of audiograms and speech audiometry to determine hearing instrument candidacy;

(e) Selection and adaptation of hearing instruments and testing of hearing instruments; and

(f) Taking ear mold impressions.

(3) Evidence of knowledge regarding the medical and rehabilitation facilities for children and adults that are available in the area served.

(4) Evidence of knowledge of grounds for revocation or suspension of license under the provisions of this chapter.

(5) Any other tests as the board may by rule establish.

[ 2014 c 189 s 6; 1996 c 200 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 7.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.